Nebraska, session 109, LB389.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-3442, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3442 (1) Property tax levies for the support of local governments
for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 1998, shall be limited to
the amounts set forth in this section except as provided in section
77-3444.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (2)(b) and (2)(e) of this
section, school districts and multiple-district school systems may levy a
maximum levy of one dollar and five cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of property subject to the levy.
(b) For each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, learning
communities may levy a maximum levy for the general fund budgets of
member school districts of ninety-five cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The proceeds from the
levy pursuant to this subdivision shall be distributed pursuant to
section 79-1073.
(c) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(e) of this section, for
each fiscal year prior to fiscal year 2017-18, school districts that are
members of learning communities may levy for purposes of such districts'
general fund budget and special building funds a maximum combined levy of
the difference of one dollar and five cents on each one hundred dollars
of taxable property subject to the levy minus the learning community levy
pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of this section for such learning
community.
(d) Excluded from the limitations in subdivisions (2)(a) and (2)(c)
of this section are (i) amounts levied to pay for current and future sums
agreed to be paid by a school district to certificated employees in
exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring prior to
September 1, 2017, (ii) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at
the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay
for current and future qualified voluntary termination incentives for
-2-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
certificated teachers pursuant to subsection (3) of section 79-8,142 that
are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d)
of this section, (iii) amounts levied by a school district otherwise at
the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay
for seventy-five percent of the current and future sums agreed to be paid
to certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of
employment occurring between September 1, 2017, and August 31, 2018, as a
result of a collective-bargaining agreement in force and effect on
September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in an exclusion
pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (iv) amounts levied by a
school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to subdivision (2)
(a) of this section to pay for fifty percent of the current and future
sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in exchange for a
voluntary termination of employment occurring between September 1, 2018,
and August 31, 2019, as a result of a collective-bargaining agreement in
force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are not otherwise included in
an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of this section, (v) amounts
levied by a school district otherwise at the maximum levy pursuant to
subdivision (2)(a) of this section to pay for twenty-five percent of the
current and future sums agreed to be paid to certificated employees in
exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring between
September 1, 2019, and August 31, 2020, as a result of a collective-
bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are
not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of
this section, (vi) amounts levied in compliance with sections 79-10,110
and 79-10,110.02, and (vii) amounts levied to pay for special building
funds and sinking funds established for projects commenced prior to April
1, 1996, for construction, expansion, or alteration of school district
buildings. For purposes of this subsection, commenced means any action
taken by the school board on the record which commits the board to expend
district funds in planning, constructing, or carrying out the project.
-3-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
(e) Federal aid school districts may exceed the maximum levy
prescribed by subdivision (2)(a) or (2)(c) of this section only to the
extent necessary to qualify to receive federal aid pursuant to Title VIII
of Public Law 103-382, as such title existed on September 1, 2001. For
purposes of this subdivision, federal aid school district means any
school district which receives ten percent or more of the revenue for its
general fund budget from federal government sources pursuant to Title
VIII of Public Law 103-382, as such title existed on September 1, 2001.
(f) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum
levy of one-half cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable property
subject to the levy for elementary learning center facility leases, for
remodeling of leased elementary learning center facilities, and for up to
fifty percent of the estimated cost for focus school or program capital
projects approved by the learning community coordinating council pursuant
to section 79-2111.
(g) For each fiscal year, learning communities may levy a maximum
levy of one and one-half cents on each one hundred dollars of taxable
property subject to the levy for early childhood education programs for
children in poverty, for elementary learning center employees, for
contracts with other entities or individuals who are not employees of the
learning community for elementary learning center programs and services,
and for pilot projects, except that no more than ten percent of such levy
may be used for elementary learning center employees.
(3) For each fiscal year through fiscal year 2023-24, community
college areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)(a) through
(c) of section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such
subdivisions. For fiscal year 2024-25 and each fiscal year thereafter,
community college areas may levy the levies provided in subdivisions (2)
(a) and (b) of section 85-1517, in accordance with the provisions of such
subdivisions. A community college area may exceed the levy provided in
subdivision (2)(a) of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to generate
-4-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
sufficient revenue as described in section 85-1543 or 85-2238. A
community college area may exceed the levy provided in subdivision (2)(b)
of section 85-1517 by the amount necessary to retire general obligation
bonds assumed by the community college area or issued pursuant to section
85-1515 according to the terms of such bonds or for any obligation
pursuant to section 85-1535 entered into prior to January 1, 1997.
(4)(a) Natural resources districts may levy a maximum levy of four
and one-half cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy.
(b) Natural resources districts shall also have the power and
authority to levy a tax equal to the dollar amount by which their
restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities under the
Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act exceed their
restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground water
management activities and integrated management activities for FY2003-04,
not to exceed one cent on each one hundred dollars of taxable valuation
annually on all of the taxable property within the district.
(c) In addition, natural resources districts located in a river
basin, subbasin, or reach that has been determined to be fully
appropriated pursuant to section 46-714 or designated as overappropriated
pursuant to section 46-713 by the Department of Natural Resources shall
also have the power and authority to levy a tax equal to the dollar
amount by which their restricted funds budgeted to administer and
implement ground water management activities and integrated management
activities under the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act
exceed their restricted funds budgeted to administer and implement ground
water management activities and integrated management activities for
FY2005-06, not to exceed three cents on each one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation on all of the taxable property within the district for
fiscal year 2006-07 and each fiscal year thereafter through fiscal year
-5-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
2017-18.
(5) For each fiscal year through fiscal year 2027-28, any Any
educational service unit authorized to levy a property tax pursuant to
section 79-1225 may levy a maximum levy of one and one-half cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. For
fiscal year 2028-29 and each fiscal year thereafter, no educational
service unit shall have the power to levy property taxes.
(6)(a) Incorporated cities and villages which are not within the
boundaries of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of forty-five
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy plus an additional five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable
valuation to provide financing for the municipality's share of revenue
required under an agreement or agreements executed pursuant to the
Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act. The maximum
levy shall include amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library
pursuant to section 51-201, museum pursuant to section 51-501, visiting
community nurse, home health nurse, or home health agency pursuant to
section 71-1637, or statue, memorial, or monument pursuant to section
80-202.
(b) Incorporated cities and villages which are within the boundaries
of a municipal county may levy a maximum levy of ninety cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy. The
maximum levy shall include amounts paid to a municipal county for county
services, amounts levied to pay for sums to support a library pursuant to
section 51-201, a museum pursuant to section 51-501, a visiting community
nurse, home health nurse, or home health agency pursuant to section
71-1637, or a statue, memorial, or monument pursuant to section 80-202.
(7) Sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence
for more than five years may levy a maximum levy of forty cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy, and
sanitary and improvement districts which have been in existence for five
-6-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
years or less shall not have a maximum levy. Unconsolidated sanitary and
improvement districts which have been in existence for more than five
years and are located in a municipal county may levy a maximum of eighty-
five cents per hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
to the levy.
(8) Counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of fifty cents per
one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy,
except that five cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy may only be levied to provide financing for
the county's share of revenue required under an agreement or agreements
executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public
Agency Act. The maximum levy shall include amounts levied to pay for sums
to support a library pursuant to section 51-201 or museum pursuant to
section 51-501. The county may allocate up to fifteen cents of its
authority to other political subdivisions subject to allocation of
property tax authority under subsection (1) of section 77-3443 and not
specifically covered in this section to levy taxes as authorized by law
which do not collectively exceed fifteen cents per one hundred dollars of
taxable valuation on any parcel or item of taxable property. The county
may allocate to one or more other political subdivisions subject to
allocation of property tax authority by the county under subsection (1)
of section 77-3443 some or all of the county's five cents per one hundred
dollars of valuation authorized for support of an agreement or agreements
to be levied by the political subdivision for the purpose of supporting
that political subdivision's share of revenue required under an agreement
or agreements executed pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the
Joint Public Agency Act. If an allocation by a county would cause another
county to exceed its levy authority under this section, the second county
may exceed the levy authority in order to levy the amount allocated.
(9) Municipal counties may levy or authorize a maximum levy of one
dollar per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject
-7-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
to the levy. The municipal county may allocate levy authority to any
political subdivision or entity subject to allocation under section
77-3443.
(10) Beginning July 1, 2016, rural and suburban fire protection
districts may levy a maximum levy of ten and one-half cents per one
hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to the levy if
(a) such district is located in a county that had a levy pursuant to
subsection (8) of this section in the previous year of at least forty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy or (b) such district had a levy request pursuant to section
77-3443 in any of the three previous years and the county board of the
county in which the greatest portion of the valuation of such district is
located did not authorize any levy authority to such district in such
year.
(11) A regional metropolitan transit authority may levy a maximum
levy of ten cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of
property subject to the levy for each fiscal year that commences on the
January 1 that follows the effective date of the conversion of the
transit authority established under the Transit Authority Law into the
regional metropolitan transit authority.
(12) Property tax levies (a) for judgments, except judgments or
orders from the Commission of Industrial Relations, obtained against a
political subdivision which require or obligate a political subdivision
to pay such judgment, to the extent such judgment is not paid by
liability insurance coverage of a political subdivision, (b) for
preexisting lease-purchase contracts approved prior to July 1, 1998, (c)
for bonds as defined in section 10-134 approved according to law and
secured by a levy on property except as provided in section 44-4317 for
bonded indebtedness issued by educational service units and school
districts, (d) for payments by a public airport to retire interest-free
loans from the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of
-8-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
Transportation in lieu of bonded indebtedness at a lower cost to the
public airport, and (e) to pay for cancer benefits provided on or after
January 1, 2022, pursuant to the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act are not
included in the levy limits established by this section.
(13) The limitations on tax levies provided in this section are to
include all other general or special levies provided by law.
Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the only exceptions to the
limits in this section are those provided by or authorized by sections
77-3442 to 77-3444.
(14) Tax levies in excess of the limitations in this section shall
be considered unauthorized levies under section 77-1606 unless approved
under section 77-3444.
(15) For purposes of sections 77-3442 to 77-3444, political
subdivision means a political subdivision of this state and a county
agricultural society.
(16) For school districts that file a binding resolution on or
before May 9, 2008, with the county assessors, county clerks, and county
treasurers for all counties in which the school district has territory
pursuant to subsection (7) of section 79-458, if the combined levies,
except levies for bonded indebtedness approved by the voters of the
school district and levies for the refinancing of such bonded
indebtedness, are in excess of the greater of (a) one dollar and twenty
cents per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation of property subject to
the levy or (b) the maximum levy authorized by a vote pursuant to section
77-3444, all school district levies, except levies for bonded
indebtedness approved by the voters of the school district and levies for
the refinancing of such bonded indebtedness, shall be considered
unauthorized levies under section 77-1606.
Sec. 2. Section 79-1201, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1201 Sections 79-1201 to 79-1249 and section 4 of this act shall
-9-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
be known and may be cited as the Educational Service Units Act.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1225, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1225 (1) After the adoption of its budget statement, the board
for each educational service unit, except as provided in subsections
subsection (2) and (3) of this section, may levy a tax in the amount
which it requires under its adopted budget statement to be received from
taxation. The levy shall be subject to the limits established by section
77-3442. The amount of such levy shall be certified by the secretary of
the educational service unit board to the county board of equalization of
each county in which any part of the geographical area of the educational
service unit is located on or before September 30 of each year. Such tax
shall be levied and assessed in the same manner as other property taxes
and entered on the books of the county treasurer. The proceeds of such
tax, as collected, shall be remitted to the treasurer of the board on or
before the fifteenth day of each month or more frequently as provided in
section 77-1759.
(2) For fiscal years year 2013-14 through 2027-28 and each fiscal
year thereafter, only an educational service unit which has four or more
member school districts or an educational service unit composed of a
single Class IV or Class V school district may levy a tax on the taxable
value of the taxable property within the geographic boundaries of the
educational service unit.
(3) For fiscal year 2028-29 and each fiscal year thereafter, no
educational service unit shall have the power to levy property taxes.
Sec. 4. (1) Beginning in 2029, funds shall be distributed by the
state to educational service units as provided in this section in order
to offset the funds lost by educational service units due to the
elimination of their levy authority under sections 77-3442 and 79-1225.
(2)(a) For 2029, the amount to be distributed to each educational
service unit under this section shall be equal to the amount of property
-10-

LB389 LB389
2025 2025
taxes levied by such educational service unit for tax year 2027,
increased by three and one-half percent; and
(b) For 2030 and each year thereafter, the amount to be distributed
to each educational service unit under this section shall be equal to the
amount distributed to such educational service unit in the prior year,
increased by three and one-half percent.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall annually determine the amount to
be distributed to each educational service unit under subsection (2) of
this section and shall certify such amounts to the State Treasurer and to
the educational service unit. The distributions to the educational
service units shall occur in two equal payments, the first on or before
March 31 and the second on or before August 31.
Sec. 5. Original sections 79-1201 and 79-1225, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 77-3442, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-11-